Louisiana, session 2026, SB475.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Arts. 1201(D), 1672(C), and 3955(D) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Code of Civil Procedure Arts. 1201(E) and (F) and 3955(E) and
(F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 1201. Citation; waiver; delay for service
* * *
D. If not waived, a request for service of citation upon the defendant shall be
considered timely if requested on the defendant within the time period provided by
this Article and all fees specified by the clerk of court for service of citation are
paid within the times provided by Paragraph E of this Article, notwithstanding
insufficient or erroneous service.
E.(1) Upon receipt of a request for service of citation pursuant to this
Article, the clerk of court shall provide to the filing party a confirmation of
receipt of the request and a statement of the initial fees for the requested
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 475 ENROLLED
service, which shall be paid within the ninety-day period for requesting service
in accordance with Paragraph C of this Article.
(2) If additional fees are owed, the clerk of court shall provide to the
filing party a statement of additional fees for the requested service, which shall
be paid within the ninety-day period for requesting service in accordance with
Paragraph C of this Article or within thirty days from the date of receipt of the
statement of additional fees from the clerk of court, whichever period is longer.
F. The provisions of this Article regarding the payment of fees for service
of citation shall not apply to litigants permitted to litigate without the payment
of costs.
* * *
Art. 1672. Involuntary dismissal
* * *
C. A judgment dismissing an action without prejudice shall be rendered as
to a person named as a defendant for whom service has not been requested or for
whom all fees specified by the clerk of court for service of citation have not been
paid within the time times prescribed by Article 1201(C) or 3955 upon the
sustaining of a declinatory exception filed by such defendant, or upon contradictory
motion of any other party, unless good cause is shown why service could not be
requested or all fees specified by the clerk of court for service of citation were
not paid, in which case the court may order that service be effected and that a
specific amount of fees for service of citation be paid within a specified time.
* * *
Art. 3955. Service of petition
* * *
D. If not waived, a request for service of citation upon the defendant shall be
considered timely if requested on the defendant within the time period provided by
this Article and all fees specified by the clerk of court for service of citation are
paid within the times provided by this Article, notwithstanding insufficient or
erroneous service.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 475 ENROLLED
E.(1) Upon receipt of a request for service of citation pursuant to this
Article, the clerk of court shall provide to the filing party a confirmation of
receipt of the request and a statement of the initial fees for the requested
service, which shall be paid within the ninety-day period for requesting service
in accordance with Paragraph A of this Article.
(2) If additional fees are owed, the clerk of court shall provide to the
filing party a statement of additional fees for the requested service, which shall
be paid within the ninety-day period for requesting service in accordance with
Paragraph A of this Article or within thirty days from the date of receipt of the
statement of additional fees from the clerk of court, whichever period is longer.
F. The provisions of this Article regarding the payment of fees for service
of citation shall not apply to litigants permitted to litigate without the payment
of costs.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall have prospective application only.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.